apertium-ido.ido.dix
<?xml version='1.0' encoding='utf-8'?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="sg" />
    <sdef n="pl" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="nom" />
    <sdef n="acc" />
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="pri" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="pp" />
    <sdef n="pprs" />
    <sdef n="pfut" />
    <sdef n="act" />
    <sdef n="pasv" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="ciph" />
    <sdef n="pres" />
    <sdef n="past" />
    <sdef n="fut" />
    <sdef n="cond" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardefs>
      <pardef n="o__n">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>o</l>
            <r><s n="n" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>i</l>
            <r><s n="n" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>on</l>
            <r><s n="n" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>in</l>
            <r><s n="n" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="a__adj">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>a</l>
            <r><s n="adj" /><s n="nom" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>an</l>
            <r><s n="adj" /><s n="acc" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="ebl__adj">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ebla</l>
            <r><s n="adj" /><s n="nom" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>eblan</l>
            <r><s n="adj" /><s n="acc" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="e__adv">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r><s n="adv" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="ar__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ar</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>as</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pri" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>is</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pii" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>os</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="fti" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>us</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="cni" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ez</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="imp" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ante</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pprs" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>inte</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pp" /><s n="act" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>onte</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pfut" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ata</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pprs" /><s n="pasv" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ita</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pp" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ota</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pfut" /><s n="pasv" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esar</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="inf" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esas</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="pri" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esis</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="pii" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esos</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="fti" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esus</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="cni" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>esez</l>
            <r><s n="vblex" /><s n="pasv" /><s n="imp" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="num">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="num" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="num_regex">
        <e>
          <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="num" /><s n="ciph" /><s n="sp" /><s n="nom" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__pr">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="pr" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__det">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="det" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__prn">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="prn" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__adv">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="adv" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="cnjcoo" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="__cnjsub">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="cnjsub" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="np__np">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l />
            <r><s n="np" /></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
    </pardefs>

    <e lm="la">
      <i>la</i>
      <par n="__det" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kande">
      <i>kande</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="1ma">
      <i>1ma</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="plu">
      <i>plu</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ma">
      <i>ma</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="li">
      <i>li</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ulu">
      <i>ulu</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nur">
      <i>nur</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nun">
      <i>nun</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ula">
      <i>ula</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="se">
      <i>se</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="mem">
      <i>mem</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="apud">
      <i>apud</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nam">
      <i>nam</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="tu">
      <i>tu</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nek">
      <i>nek</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="br">
      <i>br</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="l'">
      <i>l'</i>
      <par n="__det" />
    </e>
    <e lm="socialista">
      <i>socialist</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="tote">
      <i>tot</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="vu">
      <i>vu</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="forsan">
      <i>forsan</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ili">
      <i>ili</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="for">
      <i>for</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="lu,">
      <i>lu,</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="radio">
      <i>radi</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="liberala">
      <i>liberal</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="jus">
      <i>jus</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="2,">
      <i>2,</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="origine">
      <i>origin</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="arborizar">
      <i>arboriz</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="librovenderio">
      <i>librovenderi</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="o">
      <i>o</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="1531">
      <i>1531</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="lisboa">
      <i>lisbo</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="skopje">
      <i>skopj</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="323">
      <i>323</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="atchison, kansas">
      <i>atchison, kansas</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="badenia-wurtemberg">
      <i>badenia-wurtemberg</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="fazeolo">
      <i>fazeol</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kurt waldheim">
      <i>kurt waldheim</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="alentisque">
      <i>alentisqu</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="vesto">
      <i>vest</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="turcia">
      <i>turci</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="william byrd">
      <i>william byrd</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="antoine griezmann">
      <i>antoine griezmann</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="elche">
      <i>elch</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kopaniny (homonimo)">
      <i>kopaniny (homonimo)</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ananindeua">
      <i>ananindeu</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="homala korpo">
      <i>homala korpo</i>
      <par n="np__np" />
    </e>
    <e lm="4012 geballe">
      <i>4012 geball</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kozaki">
      <i>kozaki</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="1003 lilofee">
      <i>1003 lilof</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="kalamata">
      <i>kalamat</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="yes">
      <i>yes</i>
      <par n="__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="aprobar">
      <i>aprob</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="gratitudar">
      <i>gratitud</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="venerala">
      <i>veneral</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="uf">
      <i>uf</i>
      <par n="__pr" />
    </e>
    <e lm="urdar">
      <i>urd</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="rekompensar">
      <i>rekompens</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ridetar">
      <i>ridet</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="di qua">
      <i>di qua</i>
      <par n="__prn" />
    </e>
    <e lm="imensa">
      <i>imens</i>
      <par n="a__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="nek … nek">
      <i>nek … nek</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="permanante">
      <i>permanant</i>
      <par n="e__adv" />
    </e>
    <e lm="rinovigar">
      <i>rinovig</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="deskovrado">
      <i>deskovrad</i>
      <par n="o__n" />
    </e>
    <e lm="sequebla">
      <i>sequ</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="submisebla">
      <i>submis</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="komprenebla">
      <i>kompren</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="perturbebla">
      <i>perturb</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="licencebla">
      <i>licenc</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="censurebla">
      <i>censur</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="mastikebla">
      <i>mastik</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e lm="disputebla">
      <i>disput</i>
      <par n="ebl__adj" />
    </e>
    <e>
      <i />
      <par n="num_regex" />
    </e>
